src/errors/errormodel.default.xfscript
regex [errorUnion errorUnion] ; 
save stack errormodel.hfst
clear stack
define errorSlim [ errorUnion - 
        [
        gnMetathesis|
        initialGlideDeletion|
        structuralW|
        postYRaising|
        indDeletion|
        vvnTovvnh|
        glideBacknessAssimilation|
        preGlideLengthening|
        wiCoalescence|
        codaWDeletionMAYBEONSET|
        stridentDevoicing|
        postStridentDevoicing|
        clusterDevoicing|
        nkApos|
        kaw2kow|
        unrounding|
        ko2kwa !|
        nVSzhAlternation|
        nvw5oLEVEL|
        shortening
        ]
        ]; 

regex [errorSlim errorSlim] ; 
save stack errormodel_slim.hfst
clear stack

define errorCorbiere [errorUnion - nonConsFluidity
        ]; 

define nonConsFluidity              [y (->) [[%'::2]|[h::2]|[w::2]], 
                                     %' (->) [[w::2]|[y::2]|[h::2]],  !corbiere specific version that has apostrophes instead of h. test kinwaajbiiyan being mapped to corbiere-style kinwaajbii'an
                                     w (->) [[%'::2]|h::2|y::2] || [a|e|i|o] _ [a|e|i|o] ] ;  !this combines the y2h, glotGlide, hw rules into one, with a bit more specificity for hw

define errorCorbiere [errorCorbiere|nonConsFluidity] ; 
regex [errorCorbiere errorCorbiere] ; 
save stack errormodel_corbiere.hfst
